Idaho, session 2025, H0181.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 26-2105, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
26-2105. ORGANIZATION. (1) Any seven (7) or more residents of the ju-
risdiction of the state of Idaho, of legal age, who have a common bond re-
ferred to in section 26-2110, Idaho Code, may organize a credit union and be-
come charter members thereof by:
(a) Filing an application furnished by the director;
(b) Executing articles of incorporation by the terms of which they
agree to be bound, which articles shall state:
(i) The name, which shall include the words "credit union" and
that is not the same as the name of another existing credit union
that is authorized to do business in Idaho;
(ii) The term of existence of the credit union, which shall be per-
petual;
(iii) The par value of shares of the credit union, which shall be at
least five dollars ($5.00); and
(iv) The names and addresses of the subscribers to the articles of
incorporation, and the number of shares subscribed by each;
(c) Adopting bylaws for the general government of the credit union,
consistent with the provisions of this chapter; and
(d) Forwarding the required application fee, articles of incorpora-
tion, and the bylaws to the director. If they conform to the statute,
he shall endorse the articles of incorporation and return two (2) copies
of the endorsed articles of incorporation and two (2) copies of the by-
laws to the applicants of the credit union, one (1) copy of which is to
be for the credit union's permanent files and the other copy to be filed
with the county recorder's office in the county in which the principal
place of business is located and with the department of finance. The
credit union shall deliver one (1) copy of the endorsed articles of in-
corporation, together with any required filing fee, to the secretary of
state for filing. One (1) original copy of the articles of incorpora-
tion and bylaws shall be delivered to and retained by the department of
finance. If the director approves or endorses the articles of incor-
poration, he will issue three (3) charters in original. The director
shall have the authority to investigate the application for charter to
determine whether the proposed credit union does meet the objectives of
this chapter. The determination for the approval of the application for


charter shall be under such rules and regulations as shall be adopted
by the director. These rules and regulations shall give account to the
number of potential members, their stability of employment or member-
ship in the group comprising the common bond of membership, and the eco-
nomic characteristics of the proposed common bond. If, in the opinion
of the director, the proposed credit union does not meet these objec-
tives, the charter application shall be denied.
(2) The subscribers for a credit union charter shall not transact any
business until formal approval of the charter has been received. In order to
simplify the organization of credit unions, the director shall cause to be
prepared a form of articles of incorporation and a form of bylaws, consis-
tent with this chapter, which shall be used by credit union incorporators for
their guidance.
(3) The articles of incorporation filed in the department of finance
shall be available for inspection and a copy may be provided upon payment of
an appropriate fee.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.